District of Columbia statutes.
10-837

Evaluation committee.

The Mayor shall establish an evaluation committee of at least 5 members to review the proposals submitted in response to an RFP and provide comments and recommendations to the Mayor regarding the proposals and which proposal to accept. At least 2 members of the evaluation committee shall not be government employees and shall have professional experience related to the evaluation of the proposals.

Apr. 2, 2003, D.C. Law 14-267, § 8, 50 DCR 420

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 8 of Abandoned and Vacant Properties Community Development Disposition, and Disapproval of Disposition of Certain Scattered Vacant and Abandoned Properties Temporary of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-203, October 17, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 10021).